Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. Reservoirs
§ 41-3-316.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; actions brought against state, state engineer or employees prohibited.

No action shall be brought against the state or the state engineer or any of his agents or employees for the recovery of damages caused by the partial or total failure of any dam, reservoir or diversion system or damages caused by virtue of the operation of any dam, reservoir or diversion system upon the ground that such defendants are liable by virtue of any of the following:

The approval of the dam, reservoir or diversion system or approval of flood handling plans during construction;

The issuance or enforcement of orders relative to maintenance or operation of any dam or reservoir;

Control and regulation of any dam, reservoir or diversion system;

Measures taken to protect against failure during an emergency; or

Failure to take an action required by the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.10; Laws 1992, ch. 23, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(v), see § 41-3-307(a)(xiii).

Cited

in

Tillery v. West Side Canal, Inc., 719 P.2d 1384,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 562

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 41-3-317.
Alterations or repairs of dams or diversion systems; liability of owners.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to relieve an owner or owners of any reservoir, dam or diversion system of any legal duties, obligations or liabilities incident to their ownership or operation of or any damages resulting from the leakage or overflow of water or for floods resulting from the failure or rupture of the fill or structure for such works.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-30.11.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 41-3-307(a)(xiii).

Strict liability not imposed. —

This section was not intended to be, and is not, one which imposes absolute liability. Certainly, it was never intended to be more restrictive than Rylands v. Fletcher, L.R. 3 H.L. 330 (1868), which itself carried exceptions and therefore was not a rule of liability insurance. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

Liability under this section is absolute only when the damage-causing forces are not acts of God or the public enemy, or when courts, for other reasons, might decide to make other exceptions. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

Owner of premises is charged with duty of reasonable care

in constructing, maintaining and operating his irrigation works and facilities. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

Landowners have a right to rely upon reasonable care as a standard of conduct in responding to damage claims for escaping reservoir waters. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

Negligence determines liability of owners of failed canal headgate. —

Negligence, not strict liability, was the standard to be applied in determining the liability of the owners of a canal headgate which failed and allowed a ranch to be flooded. Tillery v. West Side Canal, 719 P.2d 1384,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 562

(Wyo. 1986).

Unlawful act of third party deemed defense. —

The unlawful act of a third party, like an act of God or the act of a public enemy, may be shown as a defense to the charge that a reservoir owner's water has escaped to do damage to his neighbor's property. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

Burden of proof on owner. —

Where damage is shown from an irrigation works, the burden of proof is upon the reservoir owner to show one of the exceptions to the absolute liability concept. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

Damage from waste water. —

Where defendant constructed an irrigation canal, and in connection therewith, an extensive basin for storing of water, and for carrying off waste water, and to guard against injury to defendant's dam and works, erected spills, which continually drained water from the basin onto plaintiff's land, defendant was liable therefor at common law, regardless of whether the basin constituted a reservoir within this section. Howell v. Big Horn Basin Colonization Co., 14 Wyo. 14, 81 P. 785,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1905).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Water Law — Wyoming Forfeiture Statute: Standing Requirement Under the Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

§ 41-3-318.
Penalties, cancellation of permit, for failure to comply with W.S. 41-3-308 through 41-3-314.

Failure to comply with the provisions of W.S.

41-3-308

through

41-3-314

shall subject the permit to cancellation at any time pursuant to W.S. 41-3-616(c). Failure to comply with any valid order issued by the state engineer pursuant to W.S.

41-3-308

through

41-3-314

, shall subject the permit holder to penalty pursuant to W.S. 41-3-616(b).

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 69, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 748; C.S. 1920, § 869; R.S. 1931, § 122-1507; C.S. 1945, § 71-607; W.S. 1957, § 41-32; Laws 1977, ch. 120, § 2; 1992, ch. 23, § 1; 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which formerly provided possible penalties of a $500 fine per day of violation and possible cancellation of a permit for failure to comply with a valid order issued by the state engineer pursuant to §§

41-3-308

through

41-3-314

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1919).

§ 41-3-319.
Owners of ditches and reservoirs; general rights.

Each owner of a share or shares of the capital stock in an incorporated ditch company existing for the purpose of distributing water through such company’s ditch to the owners of such stock, shall have the right to carry, convey and transmit reservoir water, supplementing other water rights he may possess, through the ditch of such ditch company in which he may have such stock, to the full extent of the carrying capacity represented by such stock, but no greater. Each partner in a partnership ditch owned or used for a like purpose, shall have the right to carry, convey and transmit reservoir water, supplementing other water rights he may possess, through such partnership ditch, to the full extent of the carrying capacity represented by his interest, as a partner, in such ditch, but no greater. Every such person carrying, conveying and transmitting water through such ditch, or having the same done for his benefit, shall pay all expenses incurred by reason of all extra labor in cleaning such ditch, change of division boxes, and other additional expenses made necessary by reason of carrying such reservoir water through any such ditch. The right herein granted to any person, shall also extend to the owner, manager or lessee of a reservoir, who desires to use any such ditch to carry, convey or transmit water through such ditch for the benefit of any such person to whom the right herein mentioned has been granted as aforesaid.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 104, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 865; R.S. 1931, § 122-1503; C.S. 1945, § 71-603; W.S. 1957, § 41-33.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1919).

§ 41-3-320.
Owners of ditches and reservoirs; sale or lease of impounded water.

Except as otherwise provided by deed or other written instruments of the owner or owners of the right to impound water in any reservoir, such reservoir owner or owners shall, after the completion of the works in connection with such reservoir, be held to be the owner of the right to impound the water, and the right to sell or lease a portion or all his right to the impounded waters; provided, that the sale of any portion of the capacity of any reservoir shall carry with it an interest in the reservoir and works appurtenant thereto of such proportion as the portion sold bears to the total capacity of the reservoir; and provided, further, that the water stored in any reservoir cannot be used outside the boundaries of the state of Wyoming without special permit from the state engineer; and provided, further, that the state engineer may deny any use of water from any reservoir that would be detrimental to the public interest.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 141, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-1601; C.S. 1945, § 71-612; W.S. 1957, § 41-34.

Claim of United States to storage water. —

A decree of the United States supreme court which made an equitable apportionment of the natural flow of the North Platte river between Nebraska, Wyoming and Colorado did not constitute a cloud on the claim of the United States to storage water under Wyoming law. Nebraska v. Wyoming, 325 U.S. 589, 65 S. Ct. 1332, 66 S. Ct. 1, 89 L. Ed. 1815, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 2620 (U.S. 1945), modified, 345 U.S. 981, 73 S. Ct. 1041, 97 L. Ed. 1394, 1953 U.S. LEXIS 1909 (U.S. 1953).

Discretionary power of state engineer. —

This section invests state engineer with discretion to “deny any use of water from any reservoir that would be detrimental to public interest.” In re Utah-Idaho Sugar Co., 57 Wyo. 425, 120 P.2d 601,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1942).

Where permits were granted conditioned upon obtaining rights-of-way across federal land and such rights-of-way were not obtained, state engineer's canceling permits and rejecting applications for amendments thereof was not abuse of discretion. In re Utah-Idaho Sugar Co., 57 Wyo. 425, 120 P.2d 601,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1942).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

§ 41-3-321.
Owners of ditches and reservoirs; priority of right to store or impound.

The priority of right to store or impound water under this act [§§

41-3-301

through

41-3-304

,

41-3-318

,

41-3-319

,

41-3-321

] shall date from the filing of the application in the state engineer’s office.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 69, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 750; C.S. 1920, § 871; R.S. 1931, § 122-1509; C.S. 1945, § 71-609; W.S. 1957, § 41-35.

Municipal use. —

City, prior appropriator for municipal use before date of distinction between right of appropriation for water directly from stream and appropriation from reservoirs, was authorized to impound waters appropriated for use in emergency as against claim of subsequent appropriator that water was not used for beneficial purpose. Van Tassel Real Estate & Livestock Co. v. Cheyenne, 49 Wyo. 333, 54 P.2d 906,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 299 U.S. 574, 57 S. Ct. 38, 81 L. Ed. 423, 1936 U.S. LEXIS 282 (U.S. 1936).

Cited

in

Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1912); State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1919).

§ 41-3-322.
Owner's report of persons entitled to use water; superintendent's report of use of water.

The owner of each reservoir shall annually, in writing, before or during the irrigating season and before the releasing of the water from the reservoir, deliver to the water commissioner having jurisdiction over such reservoir a list or lists of parties entitled to use water from such reservoir during the irrigating season of such year, and also a list as near as may be of the lands proposed to be irrigated, and shall immediately notify such water commissioner of any changes in such list or lists. The superintendent of the water division in which such reservoir is situated shall annually on or before the first day of December in each year make a written report to the state engineer of the state, enumerating in detail the person or persons who during the irrigating season immediately preceding use any part of such reservoir water, and shall also enumerate therein the lands upon or uses for which said water was applied during such irrigating season so that the state engineer may be kept at all times advised as to whether or not such water has been applied to beneficial uses.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 141, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 122-1603; C.S. 1945, § 71-614; W.S. 1957, § 41-36.

Intention of section. —

This section is probably, in the main at least, intended to apply to cases in which the owner of a reservoir is ready to furnish water to a number of landowners other than himself. Sturgeon v. Brooks, 73 Wyo. 436, 281 P.2d 675,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1955).

This section and §

41-3-324

were enacted for benefit of water commissioner.

Hence,
the failure of the reservoir owner to comply with these sections did
not prejudice the owner of the land upon which the reservoir was constructed.
Sturgeon v. Brooks, 73 Wyo. 436, 281 P.2d 675,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1955).

Applied

in

Stutzman v. Office of the Wyoming State Eng'r, 2006 WY 30, 130 P.3d 470,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. Mar. 16, 2006).

§ 41-3-323.
Deeds for water rights; attaching of rights to land; sale, lease, transfer or use.

The reservoir water and rights acquired under reservoir permits and adjudications shall not attach to any particular lands except by deed, or other sufficient instrument conveying such water or water rights, executed by the owner or owners of such reservoir, and such water and water rights, except when attached to particular lands as aforesaid, may be sold, leased, transferred and used in such manner and upon such lands as the owner of such rights or partial rights may desire, provided, that such water must be used for beneficial purposes.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 141, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-1602; C.S. 1945, § 71-613; W.S. 1957, § 41-37.

Primary purpose of section. —

Prior to the enactment of this section in 1921, all water rights, including reservoir rights, were attached to the land and could not be diverted therefrom. The primary purpose of the legislature in enacting this section was to permit the diversion of reservoir rights from the land. The means to accomplish this purpose under this section is by deed. Sturgeon v. Brooks, 73 Wyo. 436, 281 P.2d 675,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1955).

Section deals with reservoir owner and owner of land to be irrigated.

It does not purport to deal with third parties. A stranger to the transaction between the owner of a reservoir on the one hand and a landowner on the other, should not, ordinarily at least, be permitted to question the dealings between the latter, even though no deed was actually given for a reservoir. Sturgeon v. Brooks, 73 Wyo. 436, 281 P.2d 675,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1955).

Conveyance of land and appurtenances without reservation of reservoir rights. —

Conceding that the landowner may sever his reservoir rights from his own lands, yet if he fails to do so and conveys his land with its appurtenances without reserving his reservoir rights which are appurtenant to the land, and does not in fact convey such rights to someone else or put the reservoir to use on other lands, there is no sound reason why the reservoir rights should not pass with the conveyance of the land. It would seem that in such case there is an implied intention to that effect, since the statute requires that water should be put to a beneficial use. Sturgeon v. Brooks, 73 Wyo. 436, 281 P.2d 675,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1955).

Initiation of water right by trespass

on land of another than initiator is voidable as against landowner, who has right to grant easement in land. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

Description of land not required for permit. —

Statute does not require permits for reservoirs and storage water to incorporate description of lands to be irrigated. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Substitution possible. —

Under administrative law concerning storage water, irrigable acreage may be substituted for nonirrigable acreage included in original reservoir project. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Rights in surplus water. —

If reservoir has sufficient capacity above that required to satisfy contractual rights of owners of land in original project, reservoir owner has right to contract with others for use of storage water. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Quoted

in

Condict v. Ryan, 79 Wyo. 231, 335 P.2d 792 (1959).

Stated

in

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Dodge, 387 P.2d 679,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1963).

Cited

in

Nebraska v. Wyoming, 325 U.S. 589, 65 S. Ct. 1332, 66 S. Ct. 1, 89 L. Ed. 1815, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 2620 (1945); Condict v. Ryan, 79 Wyo. 231, 335 P.2d 792 (1959).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

For comment, “The Transfer of Water Rights for Use in the Oil Industry,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 441 (1970).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
113.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 41-3-324.
Deeds and leases for water rights; execution and recording.

All deeds for reservoir water and water rights and all leases of the same for periods of three (3) years or more shall be executed and acknowledged as deeds are executed, and shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the reservoir is situated and also filed in the office of the state engineer. All leases of such water and water rights for a period less than three (3) years shall be in writing and filed in the office of the state engineer.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 141, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 122-1604; C.S. 1945, § 71-615; W.S. 1957, § 41-38.

Application. —

Federal land patents conveying land together with the right to use the water from a reservoir as an appurtenance to the irrigable lands fall within the meaning of this section and are, therefore, subject to the filing requirement. Stutzman v. Office of the Wyoming State Eng'r, 2006 WY 30, 130 P.3d 470,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2006).

Filing not required. —

Although federal land patents conveying together with the right to use water from a reservoir as an appurtenance to irrigable lands fell under the mandatory filing requirements of this section, filing was properly denied when it had been previously adjudicated that no such rights existed. Stutzman v. Office of the Wyoming State Eng'r, 2006 WY 30, 130 P.3d 470,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2006).

Mandatory filing. —

Pursuant to the clear language of this section, deeds for reservoir water and water rights must be filed in the state engineer's office. Stutzman v. Office of the Wyoming State Eng'r, 2006 WY 30, 130 P.3d 470,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

§ 41-3-325.
Excess stored water to be furnished applicants; preferences; rates.

The owner or owners of a reservoir impounding a greater quantity of water than the owner or owners thereof necessarily use for irrigation and other beneficial purposes in connection with their own lands shall, when application is made to them for that purpose, furnish such surplus water at reasonable rates to the owners of lands lying under and capable of being irrigated from such reservoir for the purpose of irrigating and rendering the same productive, and maintaining their productiveness, and in case of refusal so to do, the owner or owners of such reservoir may be compelled by proper proceedings to furnish such water on such reasonable terms as to the court may seem meet and proper. The water user who may have used any water from such reservoir for any particular year shall have the preference as to the use of the same water for the next ensuing year. The state engineer, the water commissioner of the particular district and the water superintendent having jurisdiction over the region of any reservoir, shall together constitute a board of special commissioners, and shall have power, when application is made to them by either party interested, to establish reasonable maximum rates to be charged for the use of water from any reservoir, whether furnished by individuals or a corporation. The establishment of such rate shall be made only after notice given and public hearing had, at which hearing the applicants may produce witnesses and evidence, and such witnesses must be sworn and may be cross-examined. No commissioner shall sit upon such board and determine such rate who is employed by one (1) of the applicants or if the relationship of debtor or creditor exists between him and one (1) of the applicants. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to deny the right to store water for use for more than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 141, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 122-1605; C.S. 1945, § 71-616; Laws 1947, ch. 24, § 1; 1955, ch. 223, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-39.

Section must be considered in pari materia with §

41-3-302

.

Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Section take precedence over general statute. —

The specific provision of this section vesting jurisdiction over the region of any such reservoir in the board takes precedence over any general statute relating to common carriers, public utilities and rates in general. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Basic right to store reservoir water. —

The basic right to store reservoir water for irrigation purposes depends upon provisions for use of the water by the holders of primary permits, by the holders of secondary permits, and by the owners of other lands lying under and capable of being irrigated from the reservoir, in the order named. The constitution, statutes and decisions, fairly interpreted, mean that any rights to use such water in the state are based upon priority and beneficial use and are relevant to the rights of all interested parties. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Excess water controlled by state. —

Any water stored by a reservoir owner, over and above that covered by permits, is subject to control by the state in accordance with statute. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Meaning of “surplus water.” —

In an action to enforce payment for surplus water furnished as required by this section, the words “surplus water” will be taken to mean the water impounded by a reservoir owner, over and above that necessarily used for irrigation or other beneficial purposes in connection with his own lands. The definition in §

41-4-318

does not apply. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Individual rights to surplus water. —

Irrigation water, and more especially surplus water, cannot be treated as the absolute property of any individual. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Procedure for determining rates. —

The board, subject to the restrictions applicable to all administrative agencies, has reasonable latitude and discretion in determining the rates, as well as the elements and factors upon which the rates would depend. The functions of the board as to the rates to be charged for the use of surplus water and the functions of the public service commission of Wyoming as to the rates of various public utilities are not dissimilar. However, in reaching its determination the board must consider all relevant evidence and argument. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Hearing required even before 1955 amendment. —

Even before the 1955 amendment providing for certain requisite formalities for the meeting of the board to establish rates, thus insuring due process, this section by implication required a hearing by the board substantially similar to the one now required by law. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Board cannot ignore public interest and rights to beneficial use in regulated manner

without encouraging monopoly and speculation. Therefore, any evidence or argument which bears on this phase of the situation is relevant in a surplus water rate hearing before the board. It tends to effectuate the control and supervision which the legislature meant to keep over surplus water. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Use outside boundaries. —

Contract under which district should convey specified number of acre-feet of storage capacity in its reservoir to named person for use on place outside district boundaries was not illegal. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1938).

Effect of lack of notice and brevity of hearing. —

Lack of notice and brevity of a rate hearing by the board would seem to deprive a purchaser of surplus water of the opportunity of presenting his view of the case to the board. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Disqualification of board member. —

The fact that a board member was paid money by the reservoir company and that the company owed him money for services rendered did not, per se, render a rate hearing unfair and impartial, but he should have disqualified himself. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Court must consider state's general public policy in construing irrigation district's powers

incidental to its direct power to dispose of surplus water. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1938).

Abuse of discretion by court. —

In a suit filed by a reservoir company to compel payment for purchase of surplus water furnished the defendant based on rates established by the board pursuant to this section, a denial by the court of defendant's request for examination of the books and documents of the reservoir company constituted an abuse of discretion, where such denial deprived the defendant of a comprehensive review of the action of the board, and left defendant without having had an opportunity to be heard on what he considered was the crux of the case. Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956).

Award of damages deemed error. —

Where repeated conduct of cotenants of reservoir gave impression that they regarded another cotenant as sole owner, their assertion thereafter of right in reservoir, without offering to pay proportionate share of expenses, absent any excuse for shift in their position, allowance of damages for cotenant's refusal to furnish water is error. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 478, 102 P.2d 64,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 56 Wyo. 129, 105 P.2d 278,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 41-3-326.
Applicability of ownership provisions.

The provisions of this act [§§

41-3-320

,

41-3-322

through

41-3-327

] shall apply to reservoirs heretofore lawfully constructed as well as to all reservoirs hereafter lawfully constructed.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 141, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 122-1606; C.S. 1945, § 71-617; W.S. 1957, § 41-40.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1921, ch. 141, § 8, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 23, 1921.

§ 41-3-327.
Carey Act lands.

This act [§§

41-3-320

,

41-3-322

through

41-3-327

] shall not apply to Carey Act lands or reservoirs for their irrigation, nor to any water right or rights to the use of waters of natural streams of this state, initiated from such streams and used through any such reservoir. All acts and parts of acts in conflict herewith, excepting such as relate to Carey Act lands, are hereby repealed.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 141, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 122-1607; C.S. 1945, § 71-618; W.S. 1957, § 41-41.

Cross references. —

As to Carey Act lands generally, see chapter 7 of title 36.

Carey Act. —

The federal Carey Act, referred to in both sentences, appears as 43 U.S.C. § 641.

Cited

in

Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

§ 41-3-328.
Witnesses' fees and mileage.

Every witness who shall attend before the court, or the judge thereof in vacation, or before the person appointed to take testimony in causes relating to water rights, under subpoena, by request of any party, shall be entitled to the same fees and mileage as witnesses in civil cases in the district court, and shall be paid by the party requiring the testimony.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 61, § 27; R.S. 1887, § 1357; R.S. 1899, § 975; C.S. 1910, § 752; C.S. 1920, § 873; R.S. 1931, § 122-1511; C.S. 1945, § 71-611; W.S. 1957, § 41-45.

Cross references. —

As to witness fees, see §

1-14-102

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1919); Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 41-3-329.
Change in point of diversion.

The storage of water by means of a reservoir is a diversion, and the point of diversion is the point defined in the permit where the longitudinal axis of the dam crosses the center of the streambed.

A change in point of diversion of a reservoir may be granted pursuant to W.S.

41-3-114

by the state engineer if the water right is unadjudicated, or by the state board of control if the water right has been adjudicated. No petition shall be granted if the rights of other appropriators shall be injuriously affected thereby or if the change is not within the original project concept. In deciding whether to grant or deny a proposed change in point of diversion of a reservoir within the original project concept, the state engineer or the board of control shall consider:

The distance between the old point of diversion and the new point of diversion;

The water administration problems which may be created by granting the change in the point of diversion;

The effect of the petition upon Wyoming’s entitlement to water under compacts, court decrees and treaties;

The rights of other appropriators; and

The safety aspects of the new point of diversion.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 85, § 1.